Maryland, session 2025, HB1537.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
10–203.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section or unless excluded or
modified pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, in every sale, warranties are implied
that, at the time of the delivery of the deed to a completed improvement or at the time of
completion of an improvement not completed when the deed is delivered, the improvement
is:
(1) Free from faulty materials;
(2) Constructed according to sound engineering standards;
(3) Constructed in a workmanlike manner; and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1537*

HOUSE BILL 1537
(4) Fit for habitation.
(b) The warranties of subsection (a) of this section do not apply to [any]:
(1) ANY condition that an inspection of the premises would reveal to a
reasonably diligent purchaser at the time the contract is signed; OR
(2) AN IMPROVEMENT THAT WAS INCOMPLETE OR MISSING AT THE
TIME OF THE DELIVERY OF THE DEED.
(c) If the purchaser, expressly or by implication, makes known to the vendor the
particular purpose for which the improvement is required, and it appears that the
purchaser relies on the vendor’s skill and judgment, there is an implied warranty that the
improvement is reasonably fit for the purpose.
(d) Neither words in the contract of sale, nor the deed, nor merger of the contract
of sale into the deed is effective to exclude or modify any implied warranty. However, if the
contract of sale pertains to an improvement then completed, an implied warranty may be
excluded or modified wholly or partially by a written instrument, signed by the purchaser,
setting forth in detail the warranty to be excluded or modified, the consent of the purchaser
to exclusion or modification, and the terms of the new agreement with respect to it.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.